Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1972.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 161.045, is amended to read: 161.045 HIGHWAY USER TAX DISTRIBUTION FUND APPROPRIATIONS; TRUNK HIGHWAY FUND APPROPRIATIONS. Subdivision 1. deleted text begin Definitiondeleted text end new text begin Definitionsnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end For purposes of this section,new text begin the following terms have the meanings given.new text end new text begin (b)new text end "Commissioner" means any commissioner of a state agency that either proposes to spend or spends funds out of the highway user tax distribution fund or the trunk highway fund. new text begin (c) "Highway purposes" includes but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) construction, improvement, maintenance, and operations of a highway; new text end new text begin (2) multimodal infrastructure within a highway right-of-way related to any of the following: (i) transit; (ii) active transportation; and (iii) reduction of greenhouse gas emissions; and new text end new text begin (3) activities directly related to, or necessary to administer or support, the purposes specified in clauses (1) and (2). new text end new text begin (d) "Trunk highway purposes" includes but is not limited to highway purposes for the trunk highway system. new text end Subd. 2. General expenditure requirements. A commissioner may expend highway user tax distribution funds only for highway purposes and may expend trunk highway funds only for trunk highway purposes. Subd. 3. Limitations on spending. (a) A commissioner must not pay for any of the following with funds from the highway user tax distribution fund or the trunk highway fund: (1) Bureau of Criminal Apprehension laboratory; (2) Explore Minnesota Tourism kiosks; deleted text begin (3) Minnesota Safety Council; deleted text end deleted text begin (4) driver education programs; deleted text end deleted text begin (5)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end Office of Emergency Medical Services; deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (4)new text end Mississippi River Parkway Commission; deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end payments to the Department of Information Technology Services in excess of actual costs incurred for trunk highway purposes; deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end personnel costs incurred on behalf of the governor's office; deleted text begin (9)deleted text end new text begin (7)new text end the Office of Aeronautics within the Department of Transportation; deleted text begin (10) the Office of Transit and Active Transportation within the Department of Transportation; deleted text end deleted text begin (11) the Office of Passenger Rail; deleted text end deleted text begin (12)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end purchase and maintenance of soft body armor under section 299A.38; deleted text begin (13)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end tourist information centers; deleted text begin (14)deleted text end new text begin (10)new text end parades, events, or sponsorships of events; deleted text begin (15) the installation, construction, expansion, or maintenance of public electric vehicle infrastructure; deleted text end deleted text begin (16)deleted text end new text begin (11)new text end the statewide notification center for excavation services pursuant to chapter 216D; and deleted text begin (17)deleted text end new text begin (12)new text end manufacturing license plates. (b) The prohibition in paragraph (a) includes all expenses for the named entity or program, including but not limited to payroll, purchased services, supplies, repairs, and equipment. This prohibition on spending applies to any successor entities or programs that are substantially similar to the entity or program named in this subdivision.